Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-311
Licensed organization, defined.

Licensed organization shall mean a nonprofit organization or volunteer fire company or volunteer first-aid, rescue, ambulance, or emergency squad licensed to conduct a lottery by the sale of pickle cards under the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 77;

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 25.